test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-haanis_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:




  Noun - häänis: # 2B v-k-v, C > C (pelikukke) / CC,
    häänis+N+Sg+Nom: häänis
    häänis+N+Sg+Gen: háánnás
    häänis+N+Sg+Acc: háánnás
    häänis+N+Sg+Ill: hánásân
    häänis+N+Sg+Loc: hánásist
    häänis+N+Sg+Com: hánásáin
    häänis+N+Sg+Abe: háánnásttáá
    häänis+N+Ess: hänisin               #hánásin
    häänis+N+Par: hänisid               #hánásid
    häänis+N+Pl+Nom: hánáseh
    häänis+N+Pl+Gen: hánásij
    häänis+N+Pl+Acc: hánásijd
    häänis+N+Pl+Ill: hánásáid
    häänis+N+Pl+Loc: hánásijn
    häänis+N+Pl+Com: hánásijguin
    häänis+N+Pl+Abe: hánásijttáá
